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DTC P 1520/52StopLightSwitchSignalMalfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This signal is used to detect when the brakes have been applied. The STP signal voltage is the same as
the voltage supplied to the stop lamps.
TheSTPsignal isusedmainly tocontrol the fuel cut −offenginespeed(the fuel cut −offenginespeed is re-
duced slightly when the vehicle is braking).

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P1520/52
TheSTPsignaldoesnot turnoffevenonce thevehicle isdriv-
en
(1 tripdetection logic)

SShort instop lampswitchsignalcircuit
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SEngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using the intelligent tester II. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions when
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, and other data from the time the malfunction oc-
curred.

1 Check operation of stop lamp.

CHECK:
Check if the stop lamps go on and off normally when the brake pedal is depressed and released.

NG Check and repair stop lamp circuit.

OK

2 Check STP signal.

When using intelligent tester II:
PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the intelligent tester II to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester

II main switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the STP signal on the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Brake Pedal STP Signal

Depressed ON

Released OFF

When not using intelligent tester II:
PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check the voltage between terminal STP of the engine ECU
connectorandbodyground.
OK:

Brake Pedal Voltage

Depressed 7.5 to 14 V

Released Below 1.5V

OK Check for intermittent problems (See page
DI−4) .

NG
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3Checkstop lampswitch(SeePubNo.RM6 16E2,pageBE −58)

NG Replace or replace stop lamp switch.

OK

4 Check harness and connector between engine ECU and stop lamp switch (See
page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .


